New Jersey, session 221, A5943.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the Vehicle Choice Protection Act. 2.    As used in this act: Internal combustion engine vehicle means any motor vehicle that is powered in whole or in part by gasoline, diesel, or any other hydrocarbon-based fuel. State agency means any department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the State of New Jersey. 3.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no State agency shall adopt any rule, regulation, policy, or executive action that has the purpose or effect of prohibiting or restricting the sale, registration, or use of new internal combustion engine vehicles in the State. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.